Utah statutes.
57-17-3.   Deductions from deposit -- Written itemization -- Time for return.

Upon termination of the tenancy, property or money held as a deposit may be applied, at the owner's or designated agent's option, to the payment of accrued rent, damages to the premises beyond reasonable wear and tear, other costs provided for in the contract and cleaning of the unit. The balance of any deposit and prepaid rent, if any, and a written itemization of any deductions from the deposit, and reasons therefor, shall be delivered or mailed to the renter within 30 days after termination of the tenancy or within 15 days after receipt of the renter's new mailing address, whichever is later. The renter shall notify the owner or designated agent of the location where payment and notice may be made or mailed. If there is damage to the rented premises, this period shall be extended to 30 days.

